DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE
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DICTH-01

DTC P035 1/14|Ilgniter Coil ”A” Primary/Secondary Circuit
DTC P0352/ 14|igniter Coil ”’B” Primary/Secondary Circuit
DTC P0353/ 15]gniter Coil ”C” Primary/Secondary Circuit
DTC P0354/ 15|Igniter Coil ’D” Primary/Secondary Circuit
DTC P0355/ 14|Ilgniter Coil "E” Primary/Secondary Circuit
DTC P0356/ 14lgniter Coil "F” Primary/Secondary Circuit
DTC P0357/ 15]lgniter Coil ”G” Primary/Secondary Circuit
DTC P0358/ 15[Igniter Coil ’H” Primary/Secondary Circuit
HINT:

These DTCs indicate a malfunction related to primary circuit.

IfDTCP035 1/14isdisplayed,checkNo. 1 ignition coil withigniter circuit.
IfDTCP0352/ 14isdisplayed, check No.2ignition coil with igniter circuit.
IfDTCP0353/ 15isdisplayed, check No. 3ignition coil with igniter circuit.
IfDTCP0354/ 15isdisplayed, check No. 4ignition coil with igniter circuit.
IfDTCP0355/ 14isdisplayed, check No.5ignition coil with igniter circuit.
IfDTCP0356/ 14isdisplayed, check No. 6ignition coil with igniter circuit.
IfDTCP0357/ 15isdisplayed, check No. 7 ignition coil with igniter circuit.
IfDTCP0358/ 15isdisplayed, check No. 8ignition coil with igniter circuit.
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CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

These DTCs indicate a malfunction related to primary circuit.

TheDISisa 1-cylinderignition systemwhichignites one cylinder with oneignition coil. Inthe 1-cylinder
ignition system, the one spark plug is connected to the end of the secondary winding. High voltage generated

in the secondary winding is applied directly to the spark plug. The spark of the spark plug passes from the
center electrode to the ground electrode.

The engine control ECU determines the ignition timing and outputs the ignition signals (IGTs) for each cylin-
der. Using the IGT, the engine control ECU turns on and off the power transistor inside the igniter and this
switches on and offthe currentto the primary coil. When currentto the primary coil is cut off, high -voltage
is generated in the secondary coil and this voltage is applied to the spark plugs to create sparks inside the
cylinders. As the engine control ECU cuts the current to the primary coil, the igniter sends back the ignition
confirmation signal (IGF) for each cylinder ignition to the engine control ECU.

Engine Control ECU lgniter ety
y No.1 Ignition Coil with Igniter
IGT1 _|<—
IGF1 E é B0 Gy inder
IgnitionCoil ~ SparkPlug =
Crankshaft =
Position > IGT
Sensor 21 iNo. 2 Ignition .
IGF20 Coil with Igniter go.quIT_der
IGT3¢ No. 3 Ignition No. 3 Cvlinder
{__L coilwith igniter ' yJ_
Camshaft IGT40Q No. 4 Ignition .
Position - i Coilwith Igniter No. 4 Cylinder
Sensor =
IGT50- No. 5 Ignition .
‘ i Coilwith Igniter No.5 CyIT_der
IGT60 No. 6 Ignition :
Other Sensors: i Coil with Igniter go' %Cyllnder
(Engine Coolant Temp. -J:-
Sensor, Mass Air Flow > s —
Sensor, Throttle Position IGT7¢ ’c\l:gilz\/ilt%r}glr?i?er No. 7 Cylinder
Sensor, etc.) D> <4+
IGT8 0—— No. 8 Ignition :
Coil with Igniter No. 8 Cylinder
> <+
TAC -
To Tachometer A21429
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
P0351/14
P0352/14
/ *OpenorshortinlGF 1 orlGF2andIGT 1 tolGT8circuitfrom
P0353/15

P0354/15 No IGF signalto engine control ECU while engineis running

P0355/14 (1 tripdetectionlogic)
P0356/14

* Ignition system
* Engine control ECU

ignition coil with igniter to engine control ECU
*No. 1 toNo. 8ignition coil with igniter

P0357/15
P0358/15
. Reference: Inspection using the oscilloscope.
IGT S | Savef . . s .
7 >lgna’ savetorm During cranking or idling, check the waveform between termi-
nalslG 1 tolG8andE 1,andIGF 1,IGF2andE 1 oftheE5and
IGT .
| E7 engine control ECU connectors.
GND
IGF “ U U
GND |

"20 msec./Division

A03401

MONITOR DESCRIPTION

Ignition Coil with Igniter

Circuit Open

IGT
> Ignition Coil

Engine Control )

ECU IGF Igniter
Ignition signal 'm M M M M M
(IGT)
Ignition Normal U 1 1 1 1
confirmation
signal IGF)  Malfunction 1

Time

A20793

If the engine control ECU does not receive the IGF after sending the IGT it interprets this as a fault in the

igniter and sets a DTC.

Themonitorrunsfor 1 second (thefirstsecond of engineidle) afterthe engineis started.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
Engine Control ECU
{ _e— N\
B-R r B-R 23 % |
— — (E7 Y AAA
))l Ih1 } ( EZ NGES WA—
6 %
B-W B-W ‘a==2
S 1h1] E her
I8 Ignition Coil with Igniter No. 8 10
W-B L-B
(E7)
B-R g 113 B-R ~—11GTs
17 Ignition Coil with Igniter No. 7 13
W-B B-L
BoW 7 3 B-R ~I1GT7
2 1
W-B 16 Ignition Coil with Igniter No. 6 B_RB vy 26
B-R| B-W W-B =
B-W 4 3 B-R \_..__/l T6
2 1
B-W W-B I5 Ignition Coil with Igniter No. 5 B-R 12
W-B Y =]
B_R ;1 11% B-R NELE o
14 Ignition Coil with Igniter No. 4 B-R »
s S &)
B-W g 113 B-R IGT4
B-R
B-R| B-W W-B 13 Ignition Coil with Igniter No. 3 o5
W-B L =
B-R 7 3 B-R =61
2 1
W-B 12 Ignition Coil with Igniter No. 2 B-R 8
W-B R
B-R 4 3 B-R EL\GT2
2 1
B-R
W-B 11 Ignition Coil with IgniterNo. 1 9
o B (&)
B-W ;r 13 B-R =4 IGT1
W-B B-R
N2 Noise Filter J14 :26.t. W
W (lgnition) B-R[— B-R —— B-R = B-R gm&c
_ = R |B- _ _ _
Py {lNGl« »I |b5§ A N Ié)ZAMZ 7
EE7BI ) Engine Room J/B Cowl Side J/BLH
oC
= MAIN |5 g| i 9 lw-r |2 N w-r
§_ED_7 §_EC_7 T | satey o~ oS TO€fo~o]- BB P o€ — DD
=
L

A21368

2UZ-FEENGINESUP (RM 1113E)




DI-165
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

S If DTCs P0351/14, P0354/15, P0356/14 and P0357/15 are output simultaneously, IGF1 circuit may
be open or short.

S If DTCs P0352/14, P0353/15, P0355/14 and P0358/15 are output simultaneously, IGF2 circuit may
be open or short.

S Read freeze frame data using the hand—held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, if the air—fuel ratio was lean or
rich, as well as other data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 | Check spark plug and spark (See Pub. No. RM630E, page IG-1).

NG> Go to step 4.
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2 | Check for open and short in harness and connector in IGF signal circuits be-
tween engine control ECU and ignition coil with igniter.

Wire Harness Side: PREPA_RATION: L o
(a) Disconnectthell, 12,13, 14,15, 16, 17 or I8 ignition coil will
igniter connector.
(b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
Ignition Coil with Igniter Connector OK:
Y A21025 Tester Connection Specified Condition
Ignition coil (11-2) - IGF1 (E7-24) Below 1 Q
Ignition coil (12-2) - IGF2 (E7-23) Below 1 Q
T o Ignition coil (13-2) - IGF1 (E7-24) Below 1 Q
@ H i_i_i l i i i i i i I i i I I i i )} Ignition coil (14-2) - IGF2 (E7-23) Below 1 Q
\ Ignition coil (15-2) — IGF1 (E7-24) Below 1 Q
Ignition coil (16-2) - IGF2 (E7-23) Below 1 Q
\ i i IJ“HQLH%\ IGE2 Ignition coil (17-2) - IGF1 (E7-24) Below 1 Q
W IGF1 Engine Control ECU Ignition coil (18-2) - IGF2 (E7-23) Below 1 Q
Y Connector A21023 Ignition coil (11-2) or IGF1 (E7-24) - 10 k€2 or higher

Body ground

Ignition coil (12-2) or IGF2 (E7-23) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (13-2) or IGF1 (E7-24) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (14-2) or IGF2 (E7-23) -

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

Ignition coil (15-2) or IGF1 (E7-24) -

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

Ignition coil (16-2) or IGF2 (E7-23) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (17-2) or IGF1 (E7-24) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (18-2) or IGF2 (E7-23) -

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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3 | Disconnect ignition coil with igniter connector, and check voltage between ter-
minals IGF1, IGF2 and E1 of engine control ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
IGF1 (+) IGF2(+) (a) Disconnectthell, 12,13, 14,15, 16, 17 or I8 ignition coil with
El(-) igniter connector.

/] (b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
i ] AT .
%ﬁ'&x‘t I%‘wﬂ_,:] CHECK:

Measure the voltage between the E7 and E9 engine control
ECU connectors.

OK:
Engine Control ECU Connector
p_A19522 A19630 Tester Connection Specified Condition
IGF1 (E7-24) - E1 (E9-1) 451055V
IGF2 (E7-23) - E1 (E9-1) 451055V

RM630E, page FI-74).

NG> Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.

OK

Replace ignition coil with igniter.
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4 | Check for open and short in harness and connector in IGT signal circuit between
engine control ECU and ignition coil with igniter.

Wire Harness Side: PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnectthell, 12,13, 14,15, 16, I7 or I8 ignition coil con-
Ao d» nector.
@ (b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
& a8 —
D Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
o S . tors.
Ignition Coil with Igniter Connector
OK:
Y A21025 Tester Connection Specified Condition
Ignition coil (11-2) - IGT1 (E7-9) Below 1 Q
Ignition coil (12-2) - IGT2 (E7-8) Below 1 Q
@ T o Ignition coil (13-2) - IGT3 (E7-25) Below 1 Q
EEENEEEENEN ANEEENEEEN
H HH A Ignition coil (14-2) - IGT4 (E7-11) Below 1 Q
Ignition coil (15-2) - IGT5 (E7-12) Below 1 Q
IG-IZ Ignition coil (16-2) - IGT6 (E7-26) Below 1 Q
NG IGT2
AHNSN 1611 Ignition coil (I7-2) - IGT7 (E7-13) Below 1 Q
IGT6 IGT8 Engine Control ECU Ignition coil (18-2) - IGT8 (E7-10) Below 1 Q
IGT4  Connector —
y IGT3 IGT5 A21023 Ignition coil (11-2) or IGT1 (E7-9) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (12-2) or IGT2 (E7-8) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (13-2) or IGT3 (E7-25) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (14-2) or IGT4 (E7-11) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (15-2) or IGT5 (E7-12) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (16-2) or IGT6 (E7-26) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (17-2) or IGT7 (E7-13) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (18-2) or IGT8 (E7-10) — .
10 k< or higher
Body ground
NG Repair or replace harness or connector.
OK
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5 [ Check voltage between terminals IGT1 - IGT8 and E1 of engine control ECU con-

nector.
IGT5(+) IGT8(+) CHECK:
IGT4(+) IGT1(*) Measure the voltage between terminals the E7 and E9 engine
@ IGT2(+) E1() control ECU connectors when the engine is cranked.
==l RE=D OK:
A ll\‘l ALY LA T
TR ﬂ [:i: : i::i : H:i:'H“ HHJH]:_L Tester Connection Specified Condition

) [———
\ M W IGT1 (E7-9) - E1 (E9-1)
IGT2 (E7-8) - E1 (E9-1)
IGT6(+) IGT3(+) IGT7(+) Engine Control ECU
p Atgs22 Connector A19630

IGT3 (E7-25) - E1 (E9-1)
IGT4 (E7-11) - E1 (E9-1)
IGT5 (E7-12) - E1 (E9-1)
IGT6 (E7-26) - E1 (E9-1)
IGT7 (E7-13) - E1 (E9-1)
IGT8 (E7-10) - E1 (E9-1)

More than 0.1 V or less than 4.5V

RM630E, page FI-74).

NG> Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
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6 [ Check ignition coil with igniter power source circuit.

Wire Harness Side: PREPARATION: N o
Disconnectthell, 12,13, 14,15, 16, 17 or 18 ignition coil with igniter
connector.

Ao a2 CHECK:

a) Turn the ignition switc and to the position.
as (@) Turn the igniti itch ON and to the START positi
aso (b) Measure the voltage between the terminal of the wire har-

@ Ignition Coil with ness side connector and body ground.
Igniter Connector OK:

N A21025 Tester Connection Specified Condition

11-1 - Body ground

I12-1 - Body ground

13-1 - Body ground

14-1 - Body ground

9to 14V
I15-1 - Body ground

16—1 — Body ground

I7-1 - Body ground

18-1 - Body ground

OK> Repair ignition coil with igniter.
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7 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between ignition switch and
ignition coil with igniter.

Wire Harness Side: PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnectthell, 2,13, 14,15, 16, 17 or 18 ignition coil with
igniter connector.
(b) Disconnect the 126 ignition switch connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
an anit . _ tors.
gnition Coil with Igniter OK:
Y A21025 Tester Connection Specified Condition
Ignition coil (11-1) - 1G2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
Wire Harness Side: Ignition coil (12-1) - 1G2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
Ignition coil (13-1) - IG2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
ﬂ Ignition coil (14-1) - 1G2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
1 513 a Ignition coil (15-1) - 1G2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
5|6 718 Ignition coil (16-1) - 1G2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
(o X e ) () Ignition coil (1I7-1) - IG2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
- IC; Ignition coil (18-1) - 1G2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
Ignition Switch A21030 Ignition coil (11-1) or 1G2 (126-6) — 10 kQ or higher

Body ground

Ignition coil (12-1) or IG2 (126-6) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (13-1) or IG2 (126-6) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (14-1) or IG2 (126-6) —

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

Ignition coil (15-1) or IG2 (126-6) -

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

Ignition coil (16-1) or IG2 (126-6) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (17-1) or IG2 (126-6) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (18-1) or IG2 (126-6) -

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Replace ignition coil with igniter.
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